Ohio, session 136, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 9.64 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 9.64. (A) As used in this section : 6
(1) "Cybersecurity incident" means any of the following: 7
(a) A substantial loss of confidentiality, integrity, or 8
availability of a covered entity's information system or 9
network; 10
(b) A serious impact on the safety and resiliency of a 11
covered entity's operational systems and processes; 12
(c) A disruption of a covered entity's ability to engage 13
in business or industrial operations, or deliver goods or 14
services; 15
(d) Unauthorized access to an entity's information system 16
or network, or nonpublic information contained therein, that is 17
facilitated through or is caused by: 18

S. B. No. 203 Page 2
As Introduced
(i) A compromise of a cloud service provider, managed 19
service provider, or other third-party data hosting provider; or 20
(ii) A supply chain compromise. 21
"Cybersecurity incident" does not include mere threats of 22
disruption as extortion; events perpetrated in good faith in 23
response to a request by the system owner or operator; or 24
lawfully authorized activity of a United States, state, local, 25
tribal, or territorial government entity. 26
(2) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, 27
municipal corporation, or other body corporate and politic 28
responsible for governmental activities in a geographic area 29
smaller than that of the state. 30
(3) "Ransomware incident" means a malicious cybersecurity 31
incident in which a person or entity introduces software that 32
gains unauthorized access to or encrypts, modifies, or otherwise 33
renders unavailable a political subdivision's information 34
technology systems or data and thereafter the person or entity 35
demands a ransom to prevent the publication of the data, restore 36
access to the data, or otherwise remediate the impact of the 37
software. 38
(B) A political subdivision experiencing a ransomware 39
incident shall not pay or otherwise comply with a ransom demand 40
unless the political subdivision's legislative authority 41
formally approves the payment or compliance with the ransom 42
demand in a resolution or ordinance that specifically states why 43
the payment or compliance with the ransom demand is in the best 44
interest of the political subdivision. 45
(C) The legislative authority of a political subdivision 46
shall adopt a cybersecurity program that safeguards the 47

S. B. No. 203 Page 3
As Introduced
political subdivision's data, information technology, and 48
information technology resources to ensure availability, 49
confidentiality, and integrity. The program shall be consistent 50
with generally accepted best practices for cybersecurity, such 51
as the national institute of standards and technology 52
cybersecurity framework, and the center for internet security 53
cybersecurity best practices, and may include, but are not 54
limited to, the following: 55
(1) Identify and address the critical functions and 56
cybersecurity risks of the political subdivision. 57
(2) Identify the potential impacts of a cybersecurity 58
breach. 59
(3) Specify mechanisms to detect potential threats and 60
cybersecurity events. 61
(4) Specify procedures for the political subdivision to 62
establish communication channels, analyze incidents, and take 63
actions to contain cybersecurity incidents. 64
(5) Establish procedures for the repair of infrastructure 65
impacted by a cybersecurity incident, and the maintenance of 66
security after the incident. 67
(6) Establish cybersecurity training requirements for all 68
employees of the political subdivision; the frequency, duration, 69
and detail of which shall correspond to the duties of each 70
employee. Annual cybersecurity training provided by the state, 71
and training provided for local governments by the Ohio 72
persistent cyber initiative program of the Ohio cyber range 73
institute, satisfy the requirements of this division. 74
(D) The legislative authority of a political subdivision, 75
following each cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident, 76

S. B. No. 203 Page 4
As Introduced
shall notify both of the following: 77
(1) The executive director of the division of homeland 78
security within the department of public safety, in a manner 79
prescribed by the executive director, as soon as possible but 80
not later than seven days after the political subdivision 81
discovers the incident; 82
(2) The auditor of state, in a manner prescribed by the 83
auditor of state, as soon as possible but not later than thirty 84
days after the political subdivision discovers the incident. 85
(E) Any records, documents, or reports related to the 86
cybersecurity program and framework in division (C) of this 87
section, and the reports of a cybersecurity incident or 88
ransomware incident under division (D) of this section, are not 89
public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 90